North Carolina, session 2025, SB680.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The General Statutes is amended by adding a new Chapter to read:
"Chapter 122F.
"North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency.
"§ 122F-1. Short title.
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina Child Care Finance
Agency Act."
"§ 122A-2. Legislative findings and purposes.
(a) The General Assembly hereby finds and declares the following:
(1) That there exists in the State of North Carolina a serious shortage of accessible
and affordable child care. This statewide shortage severely impacts the State's
workforce and economy and is inimical to the health, safety, welfare and
prosperity of all residents of the State and to the sound growth of North
Carolina's economy.
(2) That private enterprise and investment have not been able to produce, without
assistance, the needed supply or rehabilitation of child care facilities to
provide sufficient child care for the State's workforce, including low-income
families. It is imperative that the supply of child care for families be increased;
and that private enterprise and investment be encouraged to sponsor, build,
rehabilitate, and operate child care for families to remove barriers to
employment and to foster health development for children.
(3) That the purposes of this Chapter are to provide financing for child care
construction, new or rehabilitated, for individuals providing high-quality child
care to families.
(4) That faith-based organizations are eligible for financing for child care
construction that provides high-quality child care.
(5) That businesses that make child care accessible to the their employees are
eligible for financing for child care construction that provides high-quality
child care.
(b) In accomplishing these public purposes, the North Carolina Child Care Finance
Agency, a public agency and an instrumentality of the State, is acting in all respects for the benefit
of the people of the State in the performance of essential public functions and serves a public
purpose in improving and otherwise promoting their health, welfare and prosperity. The North
*S680-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Carolina Child Care Finance Agency, is empowered to act on behalf of the State of North
Carolina and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.
(c) Whenever feasible, the North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency shall prioritize the
following policy goals in its actions:
(1) Give first priority in its programs to assisting child care providers with fewer
than 10 facilities.
(2) Undertake its programs in the areas where the greatest child care needs exists.
(3) Give priority to projects for child care facilities with licenses that indicate
high-quality child care, as determined by the North Carolina Child Care
Commission.
(4) Incentivize child-care providers, including faith-based organizations, to
provide full-day child care.
(5) Encourage private employers to provide on-site child care to employees, and
provide advising on information for research-based solutions, including
methods and guides to financing facilities and child care providers as partners.
(6) Encourage apprenticeships with community colleges and other institutions of
higher education for child care workers.
"§ 122F-3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Agency. – The North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency created by this
Chapter.
(2) Bonds or notes. – The bonds or the bond anticipation notes or construction
loan notes authorized to be issued by the Agency under this Chapter.
(3) Child care facility. – As defined in G.S. 110-86. For the purposes of this
chapter, a child care facility does not include a residential dwelling where
child care is provided.
(4) Construction loan. – A loan made by a lending institution or by the Authority
to any person for the purpose of financing construction of a child care facility.
(5) Federally insured securities. – An evidence of indebtedness secured by a first
mortgage lien on child care centers and insured or guaranteed as to repayment
of principal and interest by the United States or any agency or instrumentality
thereof.
(6) Governmental agency. – Any department, division, public agency, political
subdivision, or other public instrumentality of the State, the federal
government, any other State or public agency, or any two or more thereof.
(7) Mortgage or mortgage loan. – A mortgage loan for child care facilities,
including, without limitation, a mortgage loan to finance, either temporarily
or permanently, the construction, rehabilitation, improvement, or acquisition
and rehabilitation or improvement of a child care facility and a mortgage loan
insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof or for
which there is a commitment by the United States or an instrumentality thereof
to insure such a mortgage. A mortgage obligation may be evidenced by a
security document and secured by a lien upon real property, including a deed
of trust and land sale agreement.
(8) Mortgage lenders. – Any bank or trust company, savings bank, national
banking association, savings and loan association, or building and loan
association, life insurance company, mortgage banking company, the federal
government, and any other financial institution authorized to transact business
in the State.
Page 2 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Mortgagee. – The owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, the
servicer for the owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, or the trustee
for a securitized trust that holds title to a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan.
(10) Obligations. – Any bonds or bond anticipation notes authorized to be issued
by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter.
(11) Rehabilitation. – The renovation or improvement of a child care facility by the
owner or operator of that facility.
(12) Rehabilitation loan. – A loan made by a lending institution or by the Authority
to any person for the purpose of financing renovation of a child care facility.
(13) State. – The State of North Carolina.
"§ 122F-4. North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency.
(a) There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as "North Carolina
Child Care Finance Agency" which shall be constituted a public agency and an instrumentality
of the State for the performance of essential public functions.
(b) The Agency shall be governed by a board of directors composed of 12 members for
a term of four years beginning July 1. The directors of the Agency shall be residents of the State
and shall not hold other public office.
(c) The Agency shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Six members appointed by the Governor as follows:
a. One member with experience in workforce needs.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider.
c. One member with experience as a specialist in child care licensure.
d. One member with experience in construction of child care facilities.
e. One member with experience in commercial small business lending.
f. One member with experience in real estate development.
(2) Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as follows:
a. One member with experience with a savings and loan institution.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider.
c. One member with experience in construction lending.
(3) Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives as follows:
a. One member with experience with a mortgage-servicing institution.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider.
c. One member with experience in a business that makes on-site child
care available to employees.
(d) Any vacancy for a person appointed under subsection (1) of section (c) of this section
shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. Any
appointment by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with G.S. 120-121 and
vacancies in those appointments shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 120-122.
(e) Any member of the board of directors shall be eligible for reappointment. Each
member of the board of directors may be removed by the Governor for misfeasance, malfeasance
or neglect of duty after reasonable notice and a public hearing, unless the same are in writing
expressly waived. Each member of the board of directors before entering upon the duties shall
take an oath of office to administer the duties of the office faithfully and impartially, and a record
of such oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.
(f) The Governor shall designate from among the members of the Board a chair and a
vice-chair. The terms of the chair and vice-chair shall extend to the earlier of either two years or
the date of expiration of their then current terms as members of the Board of Directors of the
Agency. The Agency shall exercise all of its prescribed statutory powers independently of any
principal State Department except as described in this Chapter.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) The Executive Director of the Agency shall be appointed by the Board of Directors,
subject to approval by the Governor. All staff and employees of the Agency shall be appointed
by the Executive Director, subject to approval by the Board of Directors; shall be eligible for
participation in the State Employees' Retirement System; and shall be exempt from the provisions
of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. All employees other than the Executive Director
shall be compensated in accordance with the salary schedules adopted pursuant to the North
Carolina Human Resources Act. The salary of the Executive Director shall be fixed by the Board
of Directors. The salary of the Executive Director and all staff and employees of the Agency shall
not be subject to any limitations imposed pursuant to any salary schedule adopted pursuant to the
terms of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. The Board of Directors shall, subject to the
approval of the Governor, elect and prescribe the duties of any other officers it finds necessary
or advisable, and the Board of Directors shall fix the compensation of these officers.
(h) The books and records of the Agency shall be maintained by the Agency and shall be
subject to periodic review and audit by the State.
(i) No part of the revenues or assets of the Agency shall inure to the benefit of or be
distributable to its members or officers or other private persons. The members of the Agency
shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to receive, from funds of the
Agency, for attendance at meetings of the Agency or any committee thereof and for other services
for the Agency reimbursement for such actual expenses as may be incurred for travel and
subsistence in the performance of official duties and such per diem as is allowed by law for
members of other State boards, commissions and committees.
(j) The Executive Director shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business
of the Agency, subject to the policies, control and direction of the members of the Agency Board
of Directors. The Secretary of the Agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the Agency
and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the Agency, the minute book
or journal of the Agency and its official seal. The Secretary may have copies made of all minutes
and other records and documents of the Agency and may give certificates under the official seal
of the Agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the
Agency may rely upon such certificates.
(k) Seven members of the Board of Directors of the Agency shall constitute a quorum
and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting of the Board of
Directors duly called and held shall be necessary for any action taken by the Board of Directors
of the Agency, except adjournment; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may appoint
an executive committee to act in behalf of said Board during the period between regular meetings
of said Board, and said committee shall have full power to act upon the vote of a majority of its
members. No vacancy in the membership of the Agency shall impair the rights of a quorum to
exercise all the rights and to perform all the duties of the Agency.
"§ 122F-5. General powers.
The Agency shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the provisions
of this Chapter, including the power:
(1) To make or participate in the making of mortgage loans, construction loans,
and rehabilitation loans to licensed child care providers for rehabilitation and
construction; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the
determination by the Agency that mortgage loans, construction loans, and
rehabilitation loans are not otherwise available wholly or in part from private
lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.
(2) To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making,
purchasing and servicing its loans, notes, bonds, commitments and other
evidences of indebtedness.
(3) To acquire on a temporary basis real property, or an interest therein, in its own
name, by purchase, transfer or foreclosure, where such acquisition is
Page 4 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
necessary or appropriate to protect any loan in which the Agency has an
interest and to sell, transfer and convey any such property to a buyer and, in
the event such sale, transfer or conveyance cannot be effected with reasonable
promptness or at a reasonable price, to rent or lease such property to a tenant
pending such sale, transfer or conveyance.
(4) To sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any mortgage or other
instrument or document securing a loan of any type permitted by this Chapter.
(5) To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations in such
amounts, and from such insurers, as it may deem necessary or desirable.
(6) To consent, whenever it deems it necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of
its corporate purposes, to the modification of the rate of interest, time of
payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other terms, of any
mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, construction loan, rehabilitation
loan, contract or agreement of any kind to which the Agency is a party.
(7) To borrow money as herein provided to carry out and effectuate its corporate
purposes and to issue its obligation as evidence of any such borrowing.
(8) To include in any borrowing such amounts as may be deemed necessary by
the Agency to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period
not exceeding two years from their date, consultant, advisory and legal fees
and such other expenses as are necessary or incident to such borrowing.
(9) To make and publish rules and regulations respecting its lending programs
and such other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate its corporate
purposes.
(10) To provide technical and advisory services to sponsors, builders and
developers of child care facilities.
(11) To promote research and development in scientific methods of constructing
low-cost child care facilities of high durability and improved safety and utility.
(12) To service or contract for the servicing of mortgage loans, construction loans,
and rehabilitation loans, and to make and execute agreements, contracts and
other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and
functions of the Agency under this Chapter, including contracts with any
person, firm, corporation, governmental agency or other entity, and each and
any North Carolina governmental agency is hereby authorized to enter into
contracts and otherwise cooperate with the Agency to facilitate the purposes
of this Chapter.
(13) To receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements
respecting any appropriation or any gift, grant or donation of any property or
money, including the proceeds of general obligation bonds of the State.
(14) To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded.
(15) To establish and maintain an office for the transaction of its business in the
City of Raleigh and at such place or places as the board of directors deems
advisable or necessary in carrying out the purposes of this Chapter.
(16) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure.
(17) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business
and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the
performance of its functions and duties.
(18) To employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, real estate counselors,
appraisers and such other consultants and employees as may be required in
the judgment of the Agency and to fix and pay their compensation from funds
available to the Agency therefor.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(19) To purchase or to participate in the purchase and enter into commitments by
itself or together with others for the purchase of federally insured securities;
provided, however, that the Agency shall first determine that the proceeds of
such securities will be utilized for the purpose of making new mortgage loans
to licensed child care providers, all as specified in regulations to be adopted
by the Agency.
(20) To advise the Governor regarding the coordination of child care facilities.
(21) To acquire, hold, rent, encumber, transfer, convey, and otherwise deal with
real property and utilities in the same manner as a private person or
corporation, subject only to the approval of the Governor and Council of State.
The Board of Directors may pledge or encumber income and assets of the
Agency to secure financing for real property.
(22) To select and retain, subject to the approval of the Local Government
Commission, the financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be
associated with the issuance of any bonds and to pay for services rendered by
underwriters, financial consultants, or bond attorneys out of the proceeds of
any such issue with regard to which the services were performed.
"§ 122F-6. Rules and regulations governing Agency activity.
(a) The Agency shall from time to time adopt, modify or repeal rules and regulations
governing the purchase of federally insured securities by the Agency and the purchase and sale
of mortgage loans, construction loans, and rehabilitation loans and the application of the proceeds
thereof, including rules and regulations as to any or all of the following:
(1) Procedures for the submission of requests or the invitation of proposals for the
purchase and sale of mortgage loans, construction loans, rehabilitation loans,
or for the purchase of federally insured securities.
(2) Limitations or restrictions as to the number, location, or other qualifications
or characteristics of child care facilities to be financed by mortgage loans,
construction loans, and rehabilitation loans.
(3) Restrictions as to the interest rates on mortgage loans, construction loans, and
rehabilitation loans or the return which may be realized by lenders on any
mortgage loans, construction loans, and rehabilitation loans, or on the sale of
federally insured securities to the Agency.
(4) Requirements as to commitments by lenders with respect to the use of the
proceeds of sale of any federally insured securities.
(5) Schedules of any fees and charges necessary to provide for expenses and
reserves of the Agency.
(6) Any other matters related to the duties and the exercise of the powers of the
Agency to purchase and sell mortgage loans, construction loans, and
rehabilitation loans or to purchase federally insured securities.
Such rules and regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this Chapter
and the following specific objectives: (i) the construction of decent, safe and sanitary full day
child care facilities; (ii) the rehabilitation of present child care facilities; (iii) increasing the supply
and access to affordable child care for all families, regardless of income level; (iv) the
encouraging of private enterprise and investment to sponsor, build and rehabilitate child care
facilities; and (v) the restriction of the financial return and benefit to that necessary to protect
against the realization by lenders of an excessive financial return or benefit as determined by
prevailing market conditions.
(b) The interest rate or rates and other terms of federally insured securities or mortgage
loans, construction loans, and rehabilitation loans purchased from the proceeds of any issue of
bonds of the Agency shall be at least sufficient to assure the payment of said bonds and the
Page 6 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
interest thereon as the same become due from the amounts received by the Agency in repayment
of such federally insured securities or such loans and interest thereon.
(c) The Agency shall provide that mortgage loans, construction loans, and rehabilitation
loans are forgivable in full after 15 years if the licensed child care provider (i) serves at least
twenty-five (25%) more children than when the loan was received, and (ii) at least fifty percent
(50%) of the children served by the child care facility receive a child care subsidy.
(d) The Agency shall require as a condition of the purchase of federally insured securities
from a mortgage lender and the purchase or the making of a commitment to purchase mortgage
loans from a mortgage lender where the Agency has not given its approval prior to the initial
making of the mortgage loan that such mortgage lender shall on or prior to the
one-hundred-eightieth day (or such earlier day as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of
the Agency) following the receipt of the sale proceeds have entered into written commitments to
make, and shall thereafter proceed as promptly as practicable to make from such sale proceeds,
new mortgage loans with respect to child care facilities in the State having a stated maturity of
not less than 20 years from the date thereof in an aggregate principal amount equal to the amount
of such sale proceeds. The Agency shall not purchase nor make commitment to purchase
mortgage loans, federally insured securities or other obligations from a mortgage lender from
which it has previously purchased federally insured securities or mortgage loans initially made
without such prior approval unless said mortgage lender has either made or entered into written
commitments to make such new mortgage loans.
"§ 122F-7. Mortgage insurance authority.
(a) The Agency may upon application of a proposed mortgagee insure and make advance
commitments to insure payments required by a loan for child care facilities upon such terms and
conditions as the Agency may prescribe. Mortgage loans insured by the Agency under this
Chapter may provide financing for related ancillary facilities to the extent permitted by applicable
Agency regulations. Mortgage loans insured by the Agency under this Chapter shall be secured
by a first mortgage.
The aggregate principal amount of all mortgages so insured by the Agency under this Chapter
and outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 10 times the average annual balance for the
preceding calendar year of funds on deposit in the child care mortgage insurance fund, the
creation of which is hereby authorized. The aggregate amount of principal obligations of all
mortgages so insured shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the State
or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any
such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from moneys on deposit to the credit of the
child care mortgage insurance fund. Any contract of insurance executed by the Agency under
this section shall be conclusive evidence of eligibility for such mortgage insurance and the
validity of any contract of insurance so executed or of an advance commitment to issue such shall
be incontestable in the hands of a mortgagee from the date of execution of such contract or
commitment, except for fraud or misrepresentation on the part of such mortgagee and, as to
commitments to insure, noncompliance with the terms of the advance commitment or Agency
regulations in force at the time of issuance of the advance commitment.
(b) For mortgage payments to be eligible for insurance under the provisions of this
Chapter, the underlying mortgage loan shall:
(1) Be one which is made and held by a mortgagee approved by the Agency as
responsible and able to service the mortgage properly.
(2) Not exceed (i) ninety percent (90%) of the estimated cost of the proposed child
care facility.
(3) Have a maturity satisfactory to the Agency but in no case longer than eighty
percent (80%) of the Agency's estimate of the remaining useful life of said
child care facility or 40 years from the date of the issuance of insurance,
whichever is earlier.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Contain amortization provisions satisfactory to the Agency requiring periodic
payments by the mortgagor not in excess of the ability to pay as determined
by the Agency.
(5) Be in such form and contain such terms and provisions with respect to
maturity, property insurance, repairs, alterations, payment of taxes and
assessments, default reserves, delinquency charges, default remedies,
anticipation of maturity, additional and secondary liens, equitable and legal
redemption rights, prepayment privileges and other matters as the Agency
may prescribe.
(c) All applications for mortgage insurance shall be forwarded, together with an
application fee prescribed by the Agency, to the executive director of the Agency. The Agency
shall cause an investigation of the proposed project to be made, review the application and the
report of the investigation, and approve or deny the application. No application shall be approved
unless the Agency finds that it is consistent with the purposes of this Chapter and further finds
that the financing plan for the proposed project is sound. The Agency shall notify the applicant
and the proposed lender of its decision. Any such approval shall be conditioned upon payment
to the Agency, within such reasonable time and after notification of approval as may be specified
by the Agency, of the commitment fee prescribed by the Agency.
(d) The Agency shall fix mortgage insurance premiums for the insurance of mortgage
payments under the provision of this Chapter. Such premiums shall be computed as a percentage
of the principal of the mortgage outstanding at the beginning of each mortgage year, but shall not
be more than one half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) per year of such principal amount. The amount
of premium need not be uniform for all insured loans. Such premiums shall be payable by
mortgagors or mortgagees in such manner as prescribed by the Agency.
(e) In the event of default by the mortgagor, the mortgagee shall notify the Agency both
of the default and the mortgagee's proposed course of action. When it appears feasible, the
Agency may for a temporary period upon default or threatened default by the mortgagor authorize
mortgage payments to be made by the Agency to the mortgagee which payments shall be repaid
under such conditions as the Agency may prescribe. The Agency may also agree to revised terms
of financing when such appear prudent. The mortgagee shall be entitled to receive the benefits
of the insurance provided herein upon:
(1) Any sale of the mortgaged property by court order in foreclosure or a sale with
the consent of the Agency by the mortgagor or a subsequent owner of the
property or by the mortgagee after foreclosure or acquisition by deed in lieu
of foreclosure, provided all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor or
others arising from the mortgage, foreclosure, or any deficiency judgment
shall be assigned to the Agency without recourse except such claims as may
have been released with the consent of the Agency; or
(2) The expiration of six months after the mortgagee has taken title to the
mortgaged property under judgment of strict foreclosure, foreclosure by sale
or other judicial sale, or under a deed in lieu of foreclosure if during such
period the mortgagee has made a bona fide attempt to sell the property, and
thereafter conveys the property to the Agency with an assignment, without
recourse, to the Agency of all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor
or others arising out of the mortgage foreclosure, or deficiency judgment; or
(3) The acceptance by the Agency of title to the property or an assignment of the
mortgage, without recourse to the Agency, in the event the Agency determines
it imprudent to proceed under (1) or (2) above.
Upon the occurrence of either (1), (2) or (3) hereof, the obligation of the mortgagee to pay
premium charges for insurance shall cease, and the Agency shall, within 30 days thereafter, pay
to the mortgagee ninety-eight percent (98%) of the sum of (i) the then unpaid principal balance
Page 8 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of the insured indebtedness, (ii) the unpaid interest to the date of conveyance or assignment to
the Agency, as the case may be, (iii) the amount of all payments made by the mortgagee for
which it has not been reimbursed for taxes, insurance, assessments and mortgage insurance
premiums, and (iv) such other necessary fees, costs or expenses of the mortgagee as may be
approved by the Agency.
(f) Upon request of the mortgagee, the Agency may at any time, under such terms and
conditions as it may prescribe, consent to the release of the mortgagor from the mortgagor's
liability or consent to the release of parts of the property from the lien of the mortgage, or approve
a substitute mortgagor or sale of the property or part thereof.
(g) No claim for the benefit of the insurance provided in this Chapter shall be accepted
by the Agency except within one year after any sale or acquisition of title of the mortgaged
premises described in subdivisions (1) or (2) of subsection (e) of this section.
(h) There shall be paid into the child care mortgage insurance fund (i) all premiums
received by the Agency for the granting of such mortgage insurance, (ii) any moneys or other
assets received by the Agency as a result of default or delinquency on mortgage loans insured by
the Agency, including any proceeds from the sale or lease of real property, (iii) any moneys
appropriated and made available by the State for the purpose of such fund.
"§ 122F-8. Terms and conditions of loans to and by lenders.
(a) The Agency shall from time to time adopt, modify, amend or repeal rules and
regulations governing the making of loans to lenders and the application of the proceeds thereof.
These rules and regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this Chapter
and the following specific objectives: (i) the construction and renovation of decent, safe and
sanitary child care facilities; (ii) the encouragement of private enterprise and investment to
sponsor, build and renovate child care facilities; (iii) the increase in the supply and access to
affordable child care for all families, regardless of income level; and (iv) the restriction of the
financial return and benefit to the mortgage lenders from such loans to an amount that is
necessary to induce their participation and that is not excessive as determined by prevailing
market conditions.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the interest rate or rates and other
terms of the loans to lenders made from the proceeds of any issue of bonds of the Agency shall
provide that the amounts received by the Agency in repayment of the loans and interest thereon
shall be at least sufficient to assure the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds
as they become due.
(c) The Agency shall enter into a written agreement with each lender that shall require as
a condition of each loan to such lender that the lender shall originate new mortgage loans,
construction loans, and rehabilitation loans within a reasonable period of time as determined by
the Agency's rules and regulations and that such new loans shall have such stated maturities as
determined by the Agency's rules and regulations.
(d) The loans to lenders shall be general obligations of the respective lenders owing them.
The Agency shall require that such loans shall be secured as to payment of both principal and
interest by a pledge and lien upon collateral security. The collateral security itself shall be in such
amount as the Agency determines will assure the payment of the principal of and the interest on
the bonds as they become due. Collateral security shall be deemed to be sufficient if the principal
of and the interest on the collateral security, when due, will be sufficient to pay the principal of
and the interest on the bonds. The collateral security shall consist of any of the following items:
(i) direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the State or the United States of America;
(ii) bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, satisfactory to the Agency,
issued by any of the following federal agencies: Bank for Cooperatives, Federal Intermediate
Credit Bank, Export-Import Bank of Washington, Federal Land Banks, the Government National
Mortgage Association; (iii) direct obligations of or obligations guaranteed by the State; (iv)
mortgages insured or guaranteed by the United States of America or an instrumentality of it as
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to payment of principal and interest; (v) any other mortgages secured by real estate on which
there is located a commercial structure, the collateral value of which shall be determined by the
regulations issued from time to time by the Agency; (vii) certificates of deposit of banks or trust
companies, including the trustee, organized under the laws of the United States or any state,
which have a combined capital and surplus of at least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000); (viii)
Bankers Acceptances; and (ix) commercial paper that has been classified for rating purposes by
Dun & Bradstreet, Inc., as Prime-1 or by Standard & Poor's Corp. as A-1.
(e) The Agency may require as a condition of any loan to a lender such representations
and warranties that it determines to be necessary to secure such loans and to carry out the
purposes of this section.
"§ 122F-9. Credit of State not pledged.
Obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a
debt, liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the
faith and credit of the State or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from
the revenues or assets of the Agency. Each obligation issued under this Chapter shall contain on
the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Agency shall not be obligated to pay the same
nor the interest thereon except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor and that neither the
faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged
to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligation.
Expenses incurred by the Agency in carrying out the provisions of this Chapter may be made
payable from funds provided pursuant to this Chapter and no liability shall be incurred by the
Agency hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided.
"§ 122F-10. Bonds and notes.
The Agency is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time,
of bonds and notes of the Agency to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes. The Agency
also is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time of (i) bond
anticipation notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds and (ii) construction loan notes
to finance the making or purchase of mortgage loans, construction loans, and rehabilitation loans,
for the construction, rehabilitation or improvement of child care facilities. The total amount of
bonds, bond anticipation notes, and construction loan notes outstanding at any one time shall not
exceed twelve billion dollars ($12,000,000,000) excluding therefrom any bond anticipation notes
for the payment of which bonds have been issued. The principal of and the interest on such bonds
or notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. Any such notes
may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or
renewal note proceeds are not available, such notes may be paid from any available revenues or
assets of the Agency. The bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made
redeemable before maturity at the option of the Agency at such price or prices and under such
terms and conditions as may be determined by the Agency. Any such bonds or notes shall bear
interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Local Government Commission of
North Carolina with the approval of the Agency. Notes shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding 10 years from their date or dates and bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding 43 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Agency. The Agency
shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds or notes, including any interest
coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations and the place or
places of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or
without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall
appear on any bonds or notes or coupons attached thereto shall cease to be such officer before
the delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient
for all purposes the same as if that officer had remained in office until such delivery. The Agency
may also provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent. The
bonds or notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Agency may
Page 10 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds or notes as to
principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon
bonds or notes of any bonds or notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the
interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes. Upon the filing with the Local Government
Commission of North Carolina of a resolution of the Agency requesting that its bonds and notes
be sold, such bonds or notes may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for
such price as the Commission shall determine to be for the best interest of the Agency and best
effectuate the purposes of this Chapter, as long as the sale is approved by the Agency.
The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued
and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Agency may
provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or in the trust agreement
hereinafter mentioned securing the same.
Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Agency may, under like restrictions, issue
interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds
when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Agency may also
provide for the replacement of any bonds or notes which shall become mutilated or shall be
destroyed or lost.
Bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this Chapter without obtaining, except
as otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter, the consent of any department, division,
commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or
the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things
which are specifically required by this Chapter and the provisions of the resolution authorizing
the issuance of such bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing the same.
"§ 122F-11. Trust agreement or resolution.
In the discretion of the Agency any obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter
may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Agency and a corporate trustee, which
may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the
State. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may
pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the Agency, including, without
limitation, mortgage loans, construction loans, rehabilitation loans, mortgage loan commitments,
contracts, agreements and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or
received by the Agency, the moneys received in payment of loans and interest thereon and any
other moneys received or to be received by the Agency. Such trust agreement or resolution may
contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of
any such obligations as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including
covenants setting forth the duties of the Agency in relation to the purposes to which obligation
proceeds may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues or assets of the Agency, the
terms and conditions for the issuance of additional obligations, and the custody, safeguarding
and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under
the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of obligations, revenues or
other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may
be required by the Agency. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and
remedies of the holders of any obligations and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right
of action by any such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution
may contain such other provisions as the Agency may deem reasonable and proper for the
security of the holders of any obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of
such trust agreement or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned
to the payment of the principal of and the interest on obligations or from any other funds available
to the Agency.
"§ 122F-12. Validity of any pledge.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The pledge of any assets or revenues of the Agency to the payment of the principal of or the
interest on any obligations of the Agency shall be valid and binding from the time when the
pledge is made and any such assets or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such
pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall
be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise
against the Agency, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Nothing herein shall
be construed to prohibit the Agency from selling any assets subject to any such pledge except to
the extent that any such sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for
the issuance of such obligations.
"§ 122F-13. Trust funds.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to
the authority of this Chapter shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as
provided in this Chapter. The resolution authorizing any obligations or the trust agreement
securing the same may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested pending
the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust
company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and
shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this Chapter
and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.
Any moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter and any other moneys
available to the Agency for investment may be invested:
(1) As provided in G.S. 159-30, except that for purposes of G.S. 159-30(b) the
Agency may deposit moneys at interest in banks or trust companies outside as
well as in this State, as long as any moneys at deposit outside this State are
collateralized to the same extent and manner as if at deposit in this State.
(2) In evidences of ownership of, or fractional undivided interests in, future
interest and principal payments on either direct obligations of the United
States government or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are
guaranteed by the United States government, which obligations are held by a
bank or trust company organized and existing under the laws of the United
States of America or any state in the capacity of custodian.
(3) In repurchase agreements with respect to (i) direct obligations of the United
States government, (ii) obligations the principal of and the interest on which
are guaranteed by the United States government, or (iii) obligations described
in G.S. 159-30(c)(2), (3), (6), or (7), if all of the following conditions are met:
a. The repurchase agreement is entered into with an institution whose
ability to pay its unsecured long-term obligations (including, if the
institution is an insurance company, its claims paying ability) is rated
in one of the two highest ratings categories by a nationally recognized
securities rating agency. If the term of the repurchase agreement is for
a period of one year or less, however, the repurchase agreement may
be entered into with an institution that does not have such a long-term
rating if its ability to pay its unsecured short-term obligations is rated
in one of the two highest ratings categories by a nationally recognized
securities rating agency. If the institution with which the agreement is
to be entered does not meet the ratings requirement of this
subparagraph, the repurchase agreement may nevertheless be entered
into with the institution if the obligations of the institution under the
repurchase agreement are fully guaranteed by another institution that
does meet the ratings requirement of this subparagraph.
b. The repurchase agreement provides that it shall be terminated, without
penalty, if the institution with which the repurchase agreement is
Page 12 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
entered or by whom the institution's obligations are guaranteed fails to
maintain (i) in the event that the repurchase agreement was entered
into in reliance upon the rating of the institution's long-term
obligations, a rating of its long-term obligations in one of the three
highest ratings categories by at least one nationally recognized
securities rating agency, or (ii) in the event that the repurchase
agreement was entered into in reliance upon the rating of the
institution's short-term obligations, a rating of its short-term
obligations in one of the two highest ratings categories by at least one
nationally recognized securities rating agency. The repurchase
agreement does not have to be terminated, however, if a new guarantor
meeting the rating requirement set forth in subparagraph a. as the
requirement necessary for the Agency to enter the repurchase
agreement agrees to fully guarantee the obligations of the institution
under the repurchase agreement.
c. The obligations that are subject to the repurchase agreement are
delivered (in physical or in book entry form) to the Agency, or any
financial institution serving either as trustee for obligations issued by
the Agency or as fiscal agent for the Agency or the State Treasurer or
are supported by a safekeeping receipt issued by a depository
satisfactory to the Agency. The repurchase agreement must provide
that the value of the underlying obligations shall be maintained at a
current market value, calculated at least daily, of not less than one
hundred percent (100%) of the repurchase price. The financial
institution serving either as trustee or as fiscal agent for the Agency
holding the obligations subject to the repurchase agreement hereunder
or the depository issuing the safekeeping receipt shall not be the
provider of the repurchase agreement.
d. A valid and perfected first security interest in the obligations which
are the subject of the repurchase agreement has been granted to the
Agency or its assignee or book entry procedures, conforming, to the
extent practicable, with federal regulations and satisfactory to the
agency have been established for the benefit of the Agency or its
assignee.
e. The securities are free and clear of any adverse third-party claims.
f. The repurchase agreement is in a form satisfactory to the Agency.
"§ 122F-14. Remedies.
Any holder of obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter or any coupons
appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the
issuance of such obligations, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by
such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or
other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted
hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by
the Agency pursuant to this Chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties
required by this Chapter or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Agency
or by any officer thereof.
"§ 122F-15. Negotiable instruments.
Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this Chapter or any recitals in any
obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter, all such obligations and interest coupons
appertaining thereto shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments under the laws of this
State, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 122F-16. Obligations eligible for investment.
Obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter are hereby made securities in which
all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance
companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors,
administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including
capital in their control or belonging to them. Such obligations are hereby made securities which
may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any
agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes
or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.
"§ 122F-17. Refunding obligations.
The Agency is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the
purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which shall have been issued under the
provisions of this Chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any
interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and, if deemed
advisable by the Agency, for any corporate purpose of the Agency. The issuance of such
obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the
rights, duties and obligations of the Agency in respect of the same shall be governed by the
provisions of this Chapter which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as such provisions
may be appropriate therefor.
Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under
this Chapter and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized
purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the
application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to
the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the obligations
being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such
refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest
on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such
proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest
on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America which shall mature or
which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not
later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will
be required for the purposes intended.
"§ 122F-18. Oversight by committees of General Assembly; annual report; audit;
construction of Chapter.
(a) Oversight. – The Finance Committee of the House of Representatives, the Finance
Committee of the Senate, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services shall exercise continuing oversight of the Agency in order to assure that the Agency is
effectively fulfilling its statutory purpose.
(b) Comprehensive Report. – The Agency shall, on or before February 15 of each year,
submit an annual comprehensive report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor,
the Office of State Budget and Management, State Auditor, the Local Government Commission,
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal
Research Division. The comprehensive report required under this subsection shall include at least
all of the following:
(1) The goals and objectives of the program administered by the Agency.
(2) The number and types of activities funded by the Agency.
(c) Audit. – The Agency shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least
once in each year by an independent certified public accountant and the cost thereof may be paid
from any available moneys of the Agency.
(d) Construction. – Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed as requiring the Agency to
receive legislative approval for the exercise of any of the powers granted by this Chapter.
Page 14 Senate Bill 680-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 122F-19. Officers not liable.
No member or other officer of the Agency shall be subject to any personal liability or
accountability by reason of his execution of any obligations or the issuance thereof.
"§ 122F-20. Authorization to accept appropriated moneys.
The Agency is authorized to accept such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time
by the General Assembly for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation,
the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of a
reserve or contingency fund to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest
on any bonds or notes of the Agency.
"§ 122F-21. Tax exemption.
The exercise of the powers granted by this Chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of
the people of the State, for their well-being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social
and economic conditions, and the Agency shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on
any property owned by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter or upon the income
therefrom.
Any obligations issued by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter shall at all times
be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality
of the State, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the
obligations, and franchise taxes. The interest on the obligations is not subject to taxation as
income.
"§ 122F-22. Conflict of interest.
If any member, officer or employee of the Agency shall be interested either directly or
indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or
corporation interested directly or indirectly in any contract with the Agency, including any loan
to any sponsor, builder or developer, such interest shall be disclosed to the Agency and shall be
set forth in the minutes of the Agency, and the member, officer or employee having such interest
therein shall not participate on behalf of the Agency in the authorization of any such contract.
"§ 122F-23. Additional method.
The foregoing sections of this Chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and
alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as
supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in
derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds or notes
under the provisions of this Chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law
applicable to the issuance of bonds or notes.
"§ 122F-24. Chapter liberally construed.
This Chapter, being necessary for the prosperity of the State and its inhabitants, shall be
liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.
"§ 122F-25. Inconsistent laws inapplicable.
Insofar as the provisions of this Chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any general
or special laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Chapter shall be controlling."
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of G.S. 122F-4, as enacted by
this act, the initial appointments to the North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency shall be
appointed to a term beginning October 1, 2025, as follows:
(1) Six members appointed by the Governor as follows:
a. One member with experience in workforce needs to a two-year term
expiring June 30, 2027.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider to a
four-year term expiring June 30, 2029.
c. One member with experience as a specialist in child care licensure to
a two-year term expiring June 30, 2027.
Senate Bill 680-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. One member with experience in construction of child care facilities to
a four-year term expiring June 30, 2029.
e. One member with experience in commercial small business lending to
a two-year term expiring June 30, 2027.
f. One member with experience in real estate development to a four-year
term expiring June 30, 2029.
(2) Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as follows:
a. One member with experience with a savings and loan institution to a
four-year term expiring June 30, 2029.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider to a
two-year term expiring June 30, 2027.
c. One member with experience in construction lending to a four-year
term expiring June 30, 2029.
(3) Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives as follows:
a. One member with experience with a mortgage-servicing institution to
a two-year term expiring June 30, 2027.
b. One member with experience as a licensed child care provider to a
four-year term expiring June 30, 2029.
c. One member with experience in a business that makes on-site child
care available to employees to a two-year term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. The State Treasurer shall invest three and one-half percent (3.5%) of
the corpus of the North Carolina Innovation Fund with the North Carolina Child Care Finance
Agency.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Administration the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in non-recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year for the North Carolina Child Care Finance Agency. The North Carolina
Child Care Finance Agency shall use the funds as provided in G.S. 122F-20, as enacted by this
act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
Page 16 Senate Bill 680-First Edition